South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S165.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: Citation SECTION 1.    This act may be cited as the "South Carolina Conservation Education Act." South Carolina Conservation Education Fund SECTION 2.    Article 9, Chapter 9, Title 50 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 50-9-980.    (A) The South Carolina Conservation Education Fund is established for the purpose of connecting youth with nature through classroom and outdoor natural resource conservation education. (B) The fund is eligible to receive appropriations of state general funds, federal funds, local government funds, donations, gifts, and grants. (C) Revenues for the fund must be remitted to the State Treasurer and credited to an account that is separate and distinct from the general fund. Balances in the fund must be retained and carried forward annually and interest earned on balances in the fund must be credited to the fund. (D) Revenues from the fund must only be used by the department for the purpose of connecting youth with nature through classroom and outdoor natural resource conservation education programs approved by the department, to include, but is not limited to: (1) funding for natural resource conservation education classes and programs approved by the department; and (2) funding for youth to attend outdoor natural resource conservation education programs approved by the department. Time effective SECTION 3.    This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. Ratified the 6th day of May, 2025. Approved the 8th day of May, 2025. __________